Oklahoma, session 2025, SB493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1705, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1705. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is hereby


authorized and empowered:


(a) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and


conduct of its business.

Req. No. 738 Page 1


(b) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure.


(c) To maintain an office at such place or places within the


state as it may designate.


(d) To sue and be sued in contract, reverse condemnation,


equity, mandamus, and similar actions in its own name, plead and be


impleaded; provided, that any and all actions at law or in equity


against the Authority shall be brought in the county in which the


principal office of the Authority shall be located, or in the county


of the residence of the plaintiff, or the county where the cause of


action arose. All privileges granted to the Authority and duties


enjoined upon the Authority by the provisions of Sections 1701


through 1734 1736 of this title may be enforced in a court of


competent jurisdiction in an action in mandamus.


(e) To construct, maintain, repair, and operate turnpike


projects and highways, with their access and connecting roads, at


such locations and on such routes as it shall determine to be


feasible and economically sound; provided, that until specifically


authorized by the Legislature, the Authority shall be authorized to


construct and operate toll turnpikes only at the following


locations:


(1) The Turner Turnpike between Oklahoma City and Tulsa.


(2) The Southwestern (H.E. Bailey) Turnpike between Oklahoma


City and Wichita Falls, Texas.



Req. No. 738 Page 2


(3) The Northeastern (Will Rogers) Turnpike between Tulsa and


Joplin, Missouri.


(4) The Eastern (Indian Nation) Turnpike between Tulsa and


Paris, Texas, including all or any part thereof between McAlester


and the Red River south of Hugo.


(5) The Cimarron Turnpike between Tulsa and Interstate Highway


north of Perry, including a connection to Stillwater.


(6) The Muskogee Turnpike between Broken Arrow and Interstate


Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls.


(7) All or any part of an extension of the Muskogee Turnpike,


beginning at a point on Interstate Highway 40 near the present south


terminus of the Muskogee Turnpike, and extending in a southeasterly


direction on an alignment near Stigler, Poteau, and Heavener to the


vicinity of the Arkansas State Line state line to furnish access to


Hot Springs, Texarkana, Shreveport, and New Orleans.


(8) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of


Luther, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of the intersection of State


Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike in Creek County, Oklahoma, or in the


vicinity of the intersection of State Highway 33 and Turner Turnpike


or U.S. Highway 66 in Creek County, Oklahoma, from any monies


available to the Authority.


(9) Add on the Will Rogers Turnpike a northbound automatic


tollgate onto State Highway 28 and a southbound on-ramp from State


Highway 28.

Req. No. 738 Page 3


(10) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Duncan extending east to the vicinity of the City of


Davis, and extending in a northeasterly direction, by way of the


vicinity of the City of Ada, to a connection in the vicinity of


Henryetta or in the vicinity of the intersection of State Highway 48


and Interstate 40; and a turnpike or any part or parts thereof from


the vicinity of Snyder extending north to the vicinity of Woodward.


(11) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a


point in the vicinity of Ponca City, or at a point on the Kansas-


Oklahoma state boundary line east of the Arkansas River and west of


the point where Oklahoma State Highway No. 18 intersects said such


state boundary line, and extending in a southeasterly direction to a


connection with the Tulsa Urban Expressway System in the general


area of the Port of Catoosa.


(12) All or any part of an Oklahoma City toll expressway system


connecting the residential, industrial, and State Capitol Complex in


the north part of Oklahoma City with the residential, industrial,


and Will Rogers World Airport Complex in the south and southwest


parts of Oklahoma City.


(13) A turnpike (The Industrial Parkway) or any part or parts


thereof beginning at a point on the Oklahoma-Kansas state boundary


line between the point where U.S. Highway 66 intersects the boundary


line and the northeast corner of Oklahoma and ending by means of a


connection or connections with Shreveport, Louisiana, and Houston,

Req. No. 738 Page 4


Texas, in southeastern Oklahoma and at no point to exceed thirty


(30) miles west of the Missouri or Arkansas border.


(14) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Velma or County Line Countyline to a point intersecting


with Interstate 35 in the area south of Davis.


(15) A turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning in the


vicinity of Watonga and extending south and/or or east to the


vicinity of north and/or or west Oklahoma City.


(16) A tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike near the


intersection of State Highway 137 and the Will Rogers Turnpike,


located south of Quapaw.


(17) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of


Porter, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Will Rogers Turnpike in the


vicinity of Adair, Oklahoma, a tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in


the vicinity of Luther, Oklahoma, and a tollgate on the H.E. Bailey


Turnpike at Elgin, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the


Authority.


(18) A tollgate on the Turner Turnpike in the vicinity of


Wellston, Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.


(19) A tollgate on the Muskogee Turnpike in the vicinity of


Brushy Mountain, Oklahoma, and in the vicinity of Elm Grove,


Oklahoma, from any monies available to the Authority.


(20) All or any part of an Oklahoma City Outer Loop expressway


system beginning in the vicinity of I-35 Interstate 35 and the

Req. No. 738 Page 5


Turner Turnpike and extending west into Canadian County and then


south to I-40 Interstate 40; and then south and east to I-35


Interstate 35 in the vicinity of Moore and Norman; and then


extending east and north to I-40 Interstate 40 east of Tinker Field;


and then extending north to the Turner Turnpike to complete the


Outer Loop.


(21) All or any part of the Tulsa south bypass expressway


system beginning in the vicinity of the Turner Turnpike near Sapulpa


and extending south and east to U.S. Highway 75 in the vicinity of


96th Street to 121st Street; and then east across the Arkansas River


to a connection with the Mingo Valley Expressway; and then south


and/or or east to a point on the Tulsa-Wagoner County Line county


line near 131st street Street south in the city City of Broken


Arrow.


(22) A new turnpike or any part thereof from near the west gate


of the Will Rogers Turnpike south to the west end of south Tulsa


Turnpike at the Tulsa-Wagoner County Line county line.


(23) A new turnpike or any parts thereof from the vicinity of


the connection between State Highway 33 and U.S. Highway 69 easterly


to the Arkansas State Line state line.


(24) A four-lane extension of the Muskogee Turnpike from


Interstate Highway 40 west of Webbers Falls to the Poteau vicinity.


(25) A new turnpike or any part or parts thereof beginning at a


point in the vicinity of northwest Tulsa, and extending in a

Req. No. 738 Page 6


northwesterly direction, by means of a connection or connections


with the cities of Pawhuska and Newkirk, to a point intersecting in


the vicinity of US U.S. Highway No. 77 and the Kansas State Line


state line.


(26) A full access interchange on the Indian Nation Turnpike


south of Interstate 40, in the vicinity of Henryetta, Oklahoma, and


in the vicinity of the proposed theme park, museum, or an industrial


facility which qualifies for the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act,


from any monies available to the Authority.


(27) A new turnpike beginning at a point directly west of the


Arkansas line and four-laning U.S. Highway 70 from that point to the


farthest western reach within the bounds of Oklahoma of U.S. Highway


creating a southern route through Oklahoma.


(28) A new turnpike and bridge or any parts thereof from a


point in the vicinity of the city intersection of Mustang Interstate


and the Kickapoo Turnpike southerly across the South Canadian


River and east of Lake Thunderbird State Park to the H.E. Bailey


Turnpike in the vicinity of the city town of Tuttle Etowah; and then


easterly across the South Canadian River westerly to a point in the


vicinity of the city City of Norman Slaughterville. Such turnpike


and bridge or any parts thereof shall not be placed west of Lake


Thunderbird State Park.


(29) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point


in the vicinity of the city City of Altus and extending in a

Req. No. 738 Page 7


northwesterly direction to a point in the vicinity of the city City


of Sayre.


(30) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at a point


in the vicinity of the city City of Enid and extending in a westerly


direction to a point in the vicinity of the city City of Woodward.


(31) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof at Fletcher,


Oklahoma, in the vicinity of the Interstate 44 and State Highway 277


intersection. Any existing on- or off-ramp or any parts thereof in


the vicinity of Fletcher, Oklahoma, shall not be removed and shall


be maintained pursuant to Section 1701 et seq. of this title.


(32) A new bridge crossing the Arkansas River between South


Delaware Avenue and Memorial Drive in Tulsa County. This project


shall commence upon a determination by the Oklahoma Transportation


Turnpike Authority that such bridge shall be self-sufficient at some


point over a thirty-year time period from the toll charges


associated with the bridge project.


(33) An exit ramp or any parts thereof from the eastbound lane


of the Turner Turnpike at 96th Street in Tulsa.


(34) An on- and off-ramp or any parts thereof on the Cimarron


Turnpike in the vicinity of the northside of the Glencoe, Oklahoma,


municipal limits.


(35) A new turnpike or any parts thereof beginning at


Interstate 44 at or near its intersection with 49th West Avenue,


past State U.S. Highway 64/412, turning northeasterly, crossing 41st

Req. No. 738 Page 8


West Avenue, and continuing eastward to the L.L. Tisdale Expressway


in Tulsa, Oklahoma.


All access roads, interchanges, or lead roads connecting such


turnpikes with existing highways must be built by funds furnished by


the Authority.


The minimum and maximum wages for the construction of the roads,


highways and projects provided for in Sections 1701 through 1734


1736 of this title shall be in accordance with the schedules of


wages used or adopted by the Commission in construction of state


highways.


The Authority is hereby authorized to enter into contracts or


agreements with agencies and instrumentalities of other states or


the national government for construction, maintenance, and operation


of interstate turnpikes or highways.


The Authority is hereby required to construct and install


automatic tollgates on the Will Rogers Turnpike at State Highway No.


near Adair.


(f) To issue turnpike revenue bonds of the Authority, payable


solely from revenues, including the revenues accruing to the trust


fund created by Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this title, for


the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more


turnpike projects. Provided that any bonds issued for the


construction of the proposed turnpike referred to in subparagraphs


(10), (20), (21), and (22) of paragraph (e) of this section shall be

Req. No. 738 Page 9


issued as one issue for all four of the proposed turnpikes and shall


be financed, constructed, and operated under one bond indenture.


(g) To fix and revise from time to time tolls for the use of


any turnpike projects.


Any common carrier having authority at the time of opening any


turnpike project to operate upon a highway approximately paralleling


the turnpike project shall be granted without further showing


authority to operate over the turnpike project to all municipalities


which such carrier is serving at the time the turnpike project is


opened to traffic. But nothing herein shall be construed as


granting any new operation rights to any common carriers.


(h) To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property


in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties.


(i) To acquire in the name of the Authority by purchase or


otherwise on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may


deem proper, or by exercise of the right of condemnation in manner


hereinafter provided, such public or private lands, including public


parks, playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights


therein, rights-of-way, property, rights, easements, and interests,


as it may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of Sections


1701 through 1734 1736 of this title; provided, that all public


property damaged in carrying out the powers granted by Sections 1701


through 1734 1736 of this title shall be restored or repaired and


placed in its original condition as nearly as practicable.

Req. No. 738 Page 10


(j) To designate, except as is provided for herein, the


location, and establish, limit, and control such points of ingress


to and egress from each turnpike project as may be necessary or


desirable in the judgment of the Authority to insure the proper


operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance


to such project from any point or points not so designated.


(k) To make and enter into all contracts and agreements


necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the


execution of its powers, and to employ consulting engineers,


attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts,


superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as


may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation;


provided, that all such expenses shall be payable solely from the


proceeds of turnpike revenue bonds issued under the provisions of


Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this title or from revenues;


provided, further, no attorney employed by the Authority, nor any


member of any law firm of which the attorney may be connected, shall


ever be paid any fee or compensation for any special or


extraordinary services.


(l) To receive and accept from any federal agency grants for or


in aid of the construction of any turnpike project, provided, the


acceptance of such grants will not reduce the amount of federal aid


for the construction, repair, or maintenance of farm-to-market roads


and other highways and bridges in this state; and to receive and

Req. No. 738 Page 11


accept aid or contributions from any source of either money,


property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and


applied only for the purposes for which such grants and


contributions may be made.


(m) To adopt such rules, and to do any and all things necessary


to comply with rules, regulations, or requirements of the Bureau of


Public Roads, Multistate Economic Development Regional Commission,


as defined in Sections 1151 through 1153, inclusive, of Title 74 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, Ozarka Region Commission Federal Highway


Administration or any other federal agency administering any law


enacted by the Congress of the United States to aid or encourage the


construction of highways.


(n) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the


powers expressly granted in Sections 1701 through 1734 1736 of this


title. The design standards for all paving shall comply with the


design standards of the American Association of State Highway and


Transportation Officials as modified by the Oklahoma Department of


Transportation. All contracts for construction work on turnpike


projects shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or bidders,


after notice by publication in a newspaper published in the county


where the work is to be done in two consecutive weekly issues of the


newspaper. In all cases where more than eight (8) miles of


construction is let at the same time and is not an advertisement for


a surface-treatment-only project, such advertisement shall provide

Req. No. 738 Page 12


for bids on sections of the turnpike not to exceed eight (8) miles.


If the project advertised is a surface-treatment-only project of


more than twenty (20) miles of road, the advertisement shall provide


for bids on sections of the road no longer than twenty (20) miles,


as well as bids on the project as a whole. Subject to the following


restrictions and limitations, the Authority shall, when contracting


for construction work, divide such work into paving projects, bridge


projects, including underpasses and overpasses, and earthmoving or


miscellaneous projects, according to the type of work to be done.


Each project shall be let under a separate contract or contracts and


no contract or project shall include more than one of such types of


construction work. Each contract for construction work shall


contain a provision that ninety percent (90%) of all labor employed


on the project shall be residents of Oklahoma. However, contracts


for bridges may include earthwork and structures for the approaches


thereto.


(o) It shall be unlawful for any member, officer or employee of


the Authority to transact with the Authority, either directly or


indirectly, any business for profit of such member, officer, or


employee; and any person, firm, or corporation knowingly


participating therein shall be equally liable for violation of this


provision.





Req. No. 738 Page 13


The term “business for profit” shall include, but not be limited


to, the acceptance or payment of any fee, commission, gift, or


consideration to such member, officer, or employee.


Violation of this provision shall constitute a felony punishable


by incarceration in the State Penitentiary custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not to exceed five (5) years or a fine of


not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such imprisonment and fine.


(p) In the event of a national emergency, the Authority,


subject to any vested rights or claims, may enter into contracts


with the federal government or any authorized agency thereof to


allow the federal government or agency thereof to use such turnpikes


partly or exclusively during the existence of such emergency,


provided, that the federal government agrees in such contract to


pay, during the term of such contract, an amount sufficient, when


added to any tolls collected, to meet all operating and maintenance


expenses, interest payments, and the minimum sinking fund and


reserve requirements of the trust agreement for the turnpike covered


by the contract.


(q) All meetings of the Authority shall be open public


meetings, and all records shall be public records, except when


considering personnel or litigation.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 738 Page 14


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-738 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:37:28 AM









































Req. No. 738 Page 15